Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 1 Governor

Editor’s notes.

— For application of this part in 2020, see Executive Orders
05.28.21.02, 08.31.20.02, 09.15.20.01, and 09.30.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 420, § 3 designated the existing provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 3 of Title 38 as Part 1.

For application of this part in 2020, see Executive Orders
05.28.21.02, 08.31.20.02,
09.15.20.01, and 09.30.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

38-3-50.
Emergency interim successors to various officials; necessity of declared emergency.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Disaster” means any happening that causes great harm or damage.

“Emergency” means a sudden generally unexpected occurrence or set of circumstances demanding immediate action.

“Emergency interim successor” means a person designated pursuant to this Code section, in the event an officer is unavailable to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of an office, until a successor is appointed or elected and qualified as may be prescribed by the Constitution, statutes, laws, charters, and ordinances of this state and its political subdivisions, or until the lawful incumbent or his successor is able to resume the exercise of the powers and the discharge of the duties of the office.

“Local offices and local officers” means positions in the political subdivisions of the state.

“Office” means the position of head of any and all departments, agencies, boards, or commissions of the state or any of its political subdivisions; all constitutional General Assembly offices; all constitutional and other county offices; all of the judgeships of the state and its political subdivisions; and all of the positions in the legislative departments of the state or its political subdivisions.

“Officer” means the individual who shall hold an office.

“Political subdivisions” means cities, counties, towns, villages, authorities, and any other bodies created by the state and exercising any of the governmental powers of the state.

“State office” and “state officer” mean positions in the government of this state.

“Unavailable” means either that a vacancy in an office exists as the result of any emergency as defined in paragraph (2) of this subsection and there is no deputy or other successor authorized to exercise all of the powers and discharge all of the duties of the office, or that the lawful incumbent of the office, including any deputy exercising the powers and discharging the duties of an office because of a vacancy, and his duly authorized deputy are absent or unable to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office.

All state officers shall within 30 days after taking office, in addition to any deputy authorized pursuant to law to exercise all of the powers and discharge the duties of office, designate by title individuals as emergency interim successors and specify their order of succession. The officer shall review and revise, as necessary, designations made pursuant to this Code section to ensure their current status. The officer will designate a sufficient number of such emergency interim successors so that there will be not less than three nor more than seven deputies or emergency interim successors or any combination thereof at any time. In the event that any state officer is unavailable following an emergency or disaster and in the event his deputy, if any, is also unavailable, the powers of his office shall be exercised and the duties of his office shall be discharged by his designated emergency interim successors in the order specified. The emergency successors shall exercise the powers and discharge the duties only until such time as the Governor under the Constitution or authority other than this Code section, or other official authorized under the Constitution or this Code section to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office of Governor, may, where a vacancy exists, appoint a successor to fill the vacancy or until a successor is otherwise appointed or elected and qualified as provided by law, or until an officer or his deputy or a preceding named emergency interim successor becomes available to exercise or resume the exercise of the powers and discharge the duties of his office.

All emergency interim successors designated under this Code section shall have the same qualifications as are prescribed by law for the officer by whom they are designated.

Designations of emergency interim successors to state officers shall become official upon the officer filing a list of the successors with the Secretary of State, who shall inform the Governor, the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency, all emergency interim successors to the officer involved, and the judge of the probate court of the county of legal residence of the successors of all such designations and any changes therein. Any designation of an emergency interim successor may be changed or altered by the officer concerned filing a notice of the change or alteration with the Secretary of State.

All constitutional county officers shall within 30 days after taking office, in addition to any deputy authorized pursuant to law to exercise all the powers and discharge the duties of the office, designate by title individuals as emergency interim successors and specify their order of succession. The successors shall have the same powers, duties, and qualifications as specified by subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section for successors to state officers. Designations of the successors shall be made in the same manner as prescribed for successors to state officers in subsection (d) of this Code section.

The legislative bodies of all political subdivisions of the state are authorized and directed to provide by ordinance or resolution for emergency interim successors for the officers of the political subdivisions. The resolutions and ordinances shall not be inconsistent with this Code section.

At the time of their designation, emergency interim successors shall take such oath as may be required for them to exercise the powers and discharge the duties of the office to which they may succeed. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person, as a prerequisite to the exercise of the powers or discharge of the duties of an office to which he succeeds, shall be required to comply with any other provision of law relative to taking office.

Emergency interim successors shall receive the same compensation as is paid the officer by whom they are appointed. The compensation shall be paid only during such time as a successor shall exercise the powers of the officer by whom he has been designated.

Governmental powers shall be exercised by emergency interim successors appointed under this Code section only during a period of emergency or disaster, as defined by this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 628, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 469, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 9; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1258, § 7; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 10/SB 416.

38-3-51.
Emergency powers of Governor; termination of emergency; limitations in energy emergency; immunity.

In the event of actual or impending emergency or disaster of natural or human origin, or pandemic influenza emergency, or impending or actual enemy attack, or a public health emergency, within or affecting this state or against the United States, the Governor may declare that a state of emergency or disaster exists. As a condition precedent to declaring that a state of emergency or disaster exists as a result of a public health emergency, the Governor shall issue a call for a special session of the General Assembly pursuant to Article V, Section II, Paragraph VII of the Constitution of Georgia, which session shall convene at 8:00 A.M. on the second day following the date of such declaration for the purpose of concurring with or terminating the public health emergency. The state of emergency or disaster shall continue until the Governor finds that the threat or danger has passed or the emergency or disaster has been dealt with, to the extent that emergency or disaster conditions no longer exist, and terminates the state of emergency or disaster. No state of emergency or disaster may continue for longer than 30 days unless renewed by the Governor. The General Assembly by concurrent resolution may terminate a state of emergency or disaster at any time. Thereupon, the Governor shall by appropriate action end the state of emergency or disaster.

A declaration of a state of emergency or disaster shall activate the emergency and disaster response and recovery aspects of the state and local emergency or disaster plans applicable to the political subdivision or area in question and shall be authority for the deployment and use of any forces to which the plan or plans apply and for use or distribution of any supplies, equipment, and materials and facilities assembled, stockpiled, or arranged to be made available pursuant to Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter or any other law relating to emergencies or disasters.

The Governor shall have and may exercise for such period as the state of emergency or disaster exists or continues the following additional emergency powers:

To enforce all laws, rules, and regulations relating to emergency management and to assume direct operational control of all civil forces and helpers in the state;

To seize, take for temporary use, or condemn property for the protection of the public in accordance with condemnation proceedings as provided by law;

To sell, lend, give, or distribute all or any such property among the inhabitants of the state and to account to the proper agency for any funds received for the property; and

To perform and exercise such other functions, powers, and duties as may be deemed necessary to promote and secure the safety and protection of the civilian population.

In addition to any other emergency powers conferred upon the Governor by law, he may:

Suspend any regulatory statute prescribing the procedures for conduct of state business, or the orders, rules, or regulations of any state agency, if strict compliance with any statute, order, rule, or regulation would in any way prevent, hinder, or delay necessary action in coping with the emergency or disaster;

Utilize all available resources of the state government and of each political subdivision of the state as reasonably necessary to cope with the emergency or disaster;

Transfer the direction, personnel, or functions of state departments and agencies or units thereof for the purpose of performing or facilitating emergency services;

Commandeer or utilize any private property if he finds this necessary to cope with the emergency or disaster;

(4.1)

Compel a health care facility to provide services or the use of its facility if such services or use are reasonable and necessary for emergency response. The use of such health care facility may include transferring the management and supervision of the health care facility to the Department of Public Health for a limited or unlimited period of time not extending beyond the termination of the public health emergency;

Direct and compel the evacuation of all or part of the population from any stricken or threatened area within the state if he deems this action necessary for the preservation of life or other disaster mitigation, response, or recovery;

Prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and destinations in connection with evacuation;

Control ingress and egress to and from a disaster area, the movement of persons within the area, and the occupancy of premises therein;

Suspend or limit the sale, dispensing, or transportation of alcoholic beverages, explosives, or combustibles; provided, however, that for purposes of this paragraph, the terms “explosives” and “combustibles” shall not include firearms or ammunition or any component thereof; and

Make provision for the availability and use of temporary emergency housing.

When the available funds are not sufficient for the purpose of paying the expenses incident to carrying out the provisions authorized by Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter, the Governor may transfer from any available fund in the state treasury such sum as may be necessary to meet the emergency or disaster; and the moneys so transferred shall be repaid to the fund from which transferred when moneys become available for that purpose by legislative appropriation or otherwise.

In the event that the Governor proclaims an emergency or disaster, as defined by Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter, to be a catastrophe within the meaning of Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(b) of the Constitution of the state, the funds referred to in the paragraph may be utilized by the Governor for the purpose of carrying out the provisions authorized by Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter.

In the event that the Governor proclaims an emergency or disaster, as defined in Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter, the Governor may provide welfare benefits to the citizens of this state in the form of grants to meet disaster related necessary expenses or serious needs of individuals or families adversely affected by an emergency or disaster in those cases where the individuals or families are unable to meet the expenses or needs from other means, provided that such grants are authorized only when matching federal funds are available for such purposes pursuant to the Disaster Relief Act of 1974 (Pub. L. 93-288).

If the Governor declares a state of emergency solely because of an energy emergency, he shall not have the authority to:

Seize, take for temporary use, or condemn property other than energy resources as authorized by paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section;

Sell, lend, give, or distribute property other than energy resources as authorized by paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of this Code section; or

Commandeer or utilize property other than energy resources as authorized by paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of this Code section.

The Governor may direct the Department of Public Health to coordinate all matters pertaining to the response of the state to a public health emergency including without limitation:

Planning and executing public health emergency assessments, mitigation, preparedness response, and recovery for the state;

Coordinating public health emergency responses between state and local authorities;

Collaborating with appropriate federal government authorities, elected officials of other states, private organizations, or private sector companies;

Coordinating recovery operations and mitigation initiatives subsequent to public health emergencies;

Organizing public information activities regarding state public health emergency response operations; and

Providing for special identification for public health personnel involved in a public health emergency.

The following due process procedures shall be applicable to any quarantine or vaccination program instituted pursuant to a declaration of a public health emergency:

Consonant with maintenance of appropriate quarantine rules, the department shall permit access to counsel in person or by such other means as practicable that do not threaten the integrity of the quarantine;

An order imposing a quarantine or a vaccination program may be appealed but shall not be stayed during the pendency of the challenge. The burden of proof shall be on the state to demonstrate that there exists a substantial risk of exposing other persons to imminent danger. With respect to vaccination, the state’s burden of proof shall be met by clear and convincing evidence. With respect to quarantine, the state’s burden of proof shall be met by a preponderance of the evidence;

An individual or a class may challenge the order before any available judge of the superior courts in the county where the individual or a member of the class resides or in Fulton County. Such judge, upon attestation of the exigency of the circumstances, may proceed ex parte with respect to the state or may appoint counsel to represent the interests of the state or other unrepresented parties. The judge hearing the matter may consolidate a multiplicity of cases or, on the motion of a party or of the court, proceed to determine the interests of a class or classes. The rules of evidence applicable to civil cases shall be applied to the fullest extent practicable taking into account the circumstances of the emergency. All parties shall have the right to subpoena and cross-examine witnesses, but in enforcement of its subpoena powers the court shall take into account the circumstances of the emergency. All proceedings shall be transcribed to the extent practicable. Filing fees shall be waived and all costs borne by the state;

The judge hearing the matter may enter an appropriate order upholding or suspending the quarantine or vaccination order. With respect to vaccination, the order may be applicable on notice to the department or its agents administering the vaccination, or otherwise in the court’s discretion. With respect to quarantines, the order shall be automatically stayed for 48 hours;

The department or any party may immediately appeal any order to the Supreme Court pursuant to paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Code Section 5-6-34. The Supreme Court, or any available Justice thereof in the event that circumstances render a full court unavailable, shall consider the appeal on an expedited basis and may suspend any time requirements for the parties to file briefs. In the event no Justice is available, then a panel of the Court of Appeals, or any Judge thereof in the event that circumstances render a panel unavailable, shall consider the appeal on an expedited basis and may suspend any time requirements for the parties to file briefs. If the trial judge has proceeded ex parte or with counsel appointed for the state, the trial court shall either direct the filing of an appeal in its order or itself certify the order for appeal. Filing fees for appeal shall be waived, all costs shall be borne by the state, and such appeals shall be heard expeditiously; and

No provisions of this paragraph shall be construed to limit or restrict the right of habeas corpus under the laws of the United States.

Any individual, partnership, association, or corporation who acts in accordance with an order, rule, or regulation entered by the Governor pursuant to the authority granted by this Code section will not be held liable to any other individual, partnership, association, or corporation by reason thereof in any action seeking legal or equitable relief.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 7; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 4; Ga. L. 1974, p. 558, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1551, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 192, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 59; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1386, §§ 12-15; Ga. L. 2009, p. 184, § 4/HB 217; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 701, § 1/HB 339; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2014, p. 599, § 2-3/HB 60.

Cross references.

Governor’s power to postpone or extend qualifying periods for election during state of emergency, §

21-2-50.1

.

For further provisions regarding emergency powers of Governor, §§

38-2-6

,

38-3-22

, 45-12-29 et seq.

Power of Public Service Commission to allocate utility service so as to protect public health, safety, and welfare, §

46-2-71

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “Article V, Section II” was substituted for “Article II, Section V” in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 599, § 1-1/HB 60, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Safe Carry Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2014, p. 599, § 2-1/HB 60, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known to be in honor of Representative Bobby Franklin.”

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 03.23.20.01 and 04.20.20.01. For application of this statute in 2022, see Executive Orders 3.31.21.02 and 04.23.21.01.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2022 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

U.S. Code.

The federal Disaster Relief Act of 1974, referred to in subsection (g) of this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 3231

et seq., and

42 U.S.C. § 5121

et seq.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Georgia. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2002).

For article, “Is Georgia Prepared for a Health Pandemic? Legal Issues Regarding Emergency Preparedness and Declaration of Emergency Health Pandemic in Georgia,”
see 15 (No. 6) Ga. St. B.J. 30 (2010).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 47 (2014).

For article, “Lurching from Complacency to Panic in the Fight Against Dangerous Microbes: A Blueprint for a Common Secure Future,” see 67 Emory L.J. 337 (2018).

For article, “The Case for Streamlining Emergency Declaration Authorities and Adapting Legal Requirements to Ever-Changing Public Health Threats,” see 67 Emory L.J. 397 (2018).

For article, “Do State Lines Make Public Health Emergencies Worse? Federal Versus State Control of Quarantine,” see 67 Emory L.J. 491 (2018).

For article, “Proposed Constitutional Carry Act of 2019:
To Amend Title 12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, Relating to the Use or Possession of Any Handgun in Parks, Historic Sites, or Recreational Areas; and to Amend Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, Relating to the Definition of Carrying and Possession of Firearms & Executive Order by the Governor Temporarily Extending Renewal Requirements for Weapons Carry Licenses,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 219 (2020).

For article, “Preemption:
Executive Order by the Governor to Ensure a Safe & Healthy Georgia:
Preemption,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 95 (2020).

For article, “Mandatory Quarantine:
Administrative order by the Georgia Department of Public Health for Public Health Control Measures:
Isolation Protocol,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2020).

For article on the 2020 amendment of this Code section, see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 135 (2020).

For article, “Forced Business Closures:
Executive Orders by the Governor Closing Private Businesses,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 111 (2020).

For article, “Public Health State of Emergency: Executive Order by the Governor Declaring a Public Health State of Emergency,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 17 (2020).

38-3-52.
Emergency locations — State government; proclamation; effect of official acts.

Whenever, due to an emergency or disaster resulting from manmade or natural causes or enemy attack, it becomes imprudent, inexpedient, or impossible to conduct the affairs of state government at the normal location of the seat thereof in Atlanta, Fulton County, the Governor, as often as the exigencies of the situation require, shall by proclamation declare an emergency temporary location or locations for the seat of government at such place or places within or outside this state as he may deem advisable under the circumstances and shall take such action and issue such orders as may be necessary for an orderly transition of the affairs of state government to the emergency temporary location or locations. The emergency temporary location or locations shall remain as the seat of government until the General Assembly shall by law establish a new location or locations or until the emergency or disaster is declared to be ended by the Governor and the seat of government is returned to its normal location.

During such time as the seat of government remains at the emergency temporary location or locations, all official acts required by law to be performed at the seat of government by any officer, agency, department, or authority in this state, including the convening and meeting of the General Assembly, shall be as valid and binding when performed at the emergency temporary location or locations as if performed at the normal location of the seat of government.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 691, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 475, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 10.

38-3-53.
Emergency locations — Meeting of General Assembly; call; suspension of constitutional rules.

The General Assembly shall meet at the new location provided for in Code Section 38-3-52 either upon the call of the Governor or, if no call is issued, through the initiative of the members thereof following an emergency or disaster resulting from manmade or natural causes or enemy attack impending or affecting this state. At such time the General Assembly shall not be limited by any constitutional provisions relating to length of sessions, and it may suspend the operation of any and all constitutional rules governing the procedure of both the House of Representatives and the Senate as it deems necessary during the period of emergency or disaster.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 473, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 11.

38-3-54.
Emergency locations — Local government; who may call meeting; effect of acts.

Whenever, due to an emergency or disaster resulting from manmade or natural causes or enemy attack, it becomes imprudent, inexpedient, or impossible to conduct the affairs of local government at the regular or usual place or places thereof, the governing body of each political subdivision, including but not limited to each and every city, county, and municipality of the state, may meet at any place within or outside the territorial limits of the political subdivision on the call of the presiding officer or any two members of the governing body and shall proceed to establish and designate by ordinance, resolution, or other manner alternate or substitute sites or places as the emergency temporary location or locations of government where all or any part of the public business may be transacted and conducted during the emergency or disaster situation. The sites or places may be within or outside the territorial limits of the political subdivision and may be within or outside this state. During the period when the public business is being conducted at the emergency temporary location or locations, the governing body and other officers of a political subdivision of this state shall have and possess and shall exercise at the location or locations all of the executive, legislative, and judicial powers and functions conferred upon such body and officers by or under the laws of this state. The powers and functions may be exercised in the light of the exigencies of the emergency situation without regard to or compliance with time-consuming procedures and formalities prescribed by law and pertaining thereto, and all acts of the body and officers shall be as valid and binding as if performed within the territorial limits of their political subdivision.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 473, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 12.

38-3-55.
Emergency locations — When authorized; proclamation.

The provisions of Code Sections 38-3-52 through 38-3-54 shall be operative only in the event and for the duration of an emergency or disaster of manmade or natural causes or enemy attack impending on or affecting this state or the United States, as proclaimed by an appropriate state official.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 473, § 3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 13.

38-3-56.
Registration of businesses during emergency.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the governing authority of any county or municipality may provide by ordinance for a program of emergency registration of all or certain designated classes of businesses doing business in the county or municipality during a state of emergency declared by the Governor. Such ordinance may be implemented for a period during which the state of emergency continues and for a subsequent recovery period of up to three months at the direction of the governing authority. In any county or municipality adopting such an ordinance, no business subject to the ordinance may do business in the county or municipality without first registering in conformance with the provisions of the ordinance.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-56

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 1362, § 3.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1995 enactment of this Code section, see 12 Georgia. St. U.L. Rev. 31 (1995).

38-3-57.
Establishment of standardized, verifiable, performance based unified incident command system; utilization; training; implementation; funding; first informer broadcasters.

The Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall establish and maintain, in collaboration with all appropriate state agencies and volunteer organizations with emergency support function roles and professional organizations that represent local public safety agencies, including the Emergency Management Association of Georgia, the Georgia Association of Police Chiefs, the Georgia Fire Chiefs’ Association, and the Georgia Sheriffs’ Association, a standardized, verifiable, performance based unified incident command system.

Such system shall be consistent with the Georgia Emergency Operations Plan and shall be utilized in response to emergencies and disasters referenced in the Georgia Emergency Operations Plan, including presidentially declared disasters and states of emergency issued by the Governor.

The Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency, in cooperation with the Georgia Public Safety Training Center and the State Forestry Commission, shall develop or adopt a course of instruction for use in training and certifying emergency response personnel in unified incident command.

All local public safety and emergency response organizations, including emergency management agencies, law enforcement agencies, fire departments, and emergency medical services, shall implement the standardized unified incident command system provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section by October 1, 2004.

Local agencies that have not established such system by October 1, 2004, shall not be eligible for state reimbursement for any response or recovery related expenses.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Broadcaster” means any corporation or other entity that is primarily engaged in the business of broadcasting video or audio programming, whether through the public airwaves, cable, direct or indirect satellite transmission, or any other similar means of communication.

“Emergency” means the declaration of a state of emergency or disaster as provided in Code Section 38-3-51 or as presidentially declared.

“First informer broadcaster” means a broadcaster in Georgia who makes application to the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency for designation as a first informer broadcaster and who is granted such designation as a first informer broadcaster pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the director of emergency management and homeland security.

The unified incident command system and the Georgia Emergency Operations Plan shall, by July 1, 2016, establish planning for first informer broadcasters such that first informer broadcasters, to any extent practicable, may during an emergency:

Have access to areas affected by an emergency for the purpose of restoring, repairing, or resupplying any facility or equipment critical to the ability of a broadcaster to acquire, produce, or transmit emergency related programming, including but not limited to repairing and maintaining transmitters and generators and transporting fuel for generators;

Have access to the distribution of fuel, food, water, supplies, equipment, and any other materials necessary for maintaining or producing a broadcast or broadcasting signal; and

Not have vehicles, fuel, food, water, and any other materials seized or condemned that are essential for maintaining or producing a broadcast or broadcasting signal.

The Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency may develop or adopt courses of instruction for use in training personnel of first informer broadcasters on personal safety and navigation in an area affected by an emergency. The requirements of any such training shall be established pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the director of emergency management and homeland security. The costs of any such training shall be paid by the first informer broadcasters participating in the training.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-57

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 743, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 38/HB 942; Ga. L. 2014, p. 680, § 2/SB 381; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 11/SB 416.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “roles” was substituted for “roles,” and “performance based” was substituted for “performance-based” in subsection (a); and “presidentially” was substituted for “Presidentially” in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 680, § 1/SB 381, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia First Informer Broadcasters Act.’ ”

38-3-58.
“Essentials” defined; system to facilitate transport and distribution; certification.

As used in this Code section, the term “essentials” means goods that are consumed or used as a direct result of a state of emergency declared by the Governor or that are consumed or used to preserve, protect, or sustain life, health, safety, or economic well-being.

Notwithstanding Code Section 38-3-56, the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall establish a state-wide system to facilitate the transport and distribution of essentials in commerce during a state of emergency declared by the Governor for the purpose of meeting the needs of the residents of this state during such an emergency and to ensure the continuing economic resilience of communities impacted by such an emergency.

In conformance with subsection (b) of this Code section, such system shall provide for a certification of organizations and business entities that facilitate, or are likely to facilitate, the transport or distribution of essentials where such certification shall apply to all employees or agents of such organizations and business entities who, as designated by such organizations and business entities, are employed to facilitate the transport or distribution of essentials. In providing for such certification, the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency:

May provide for a preemergency or postemergency certification;

May rely on information provided for by bona fide employers in this state about the jobs performed by their employees relating to essentials;

Shall create easily recognizable indicia of certification to assist the efforts of local officials in determining the employees and agents of such organizations and business entities which are certified pursuant to this Code section; and

May provide for an electronic certification process and an electronic distribution of the recognizable indicia of certification.

Except as provided for in this Code section, the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall not require any organization, business entity, or individual to obtain any additional certification or to fulfill any additional requirement to transport or distribute essentials in commerce during a state of emergency declared by the Governor.

Notwithstanding any established curfew, a designated employee or agent of an organization or business entity certified pursuant to this Code section may enter or remain in a curfew area beyond the restrictions of the curfew for the limited purpose of facilitating the transport or distribution of essentials. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency or local officials from specifying a permissible route of ingress or egress or from denying access to an area in order to preserve, protect, or sustain the life, health, safety, or economic well-being of a person or property or from granting access as otherwise deemed necessary.

The Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency may suspend or revoke certification granted pursuant to this Code section as a result of any violation or abuse of this certification. If the suspension is based on a reported violation or abuse, the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall investigate the reported violation or abuse in a timely manner.

If the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency suspends or revokes a certification, such agency shall communicate the cause of the suspension or revocation to the certified organization or business entity as provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section. If the suspension is based on a reported violation, the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall investigate the reported violation in a timely manner to determine whether the reported violation occurred.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-58

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 740, § 1/HB 405.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2017).